Missouri, session 2026, HB2498.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 43.503, 211.071, 211.151, and 211.261, RSMo, are repealed and
four new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 43.503, 211.071, 211.151,
and 211.261, to read as follows:
43.503. 1. For the purpose of maintaining complete and accurate criminal history
record information, all police officers of this state, the clerk of each court, the department of
corrections, the sheriff of each county, the chief law enforcement official of a city not within a
county and the prosecuting attorney of each county or the circuit attorney of a city not within
a county shall submit certain criminal arrest, charge, and disposition information to the
central repository for filing without undue delay in the form and manner required by sections
43.500 to 43.651.
2. All law enforcement agencies making misdemeanor and felony arrests as
determined by section 43.506 shall furnish without undue delay, to the central repository,
fingerprints, photograph, and if available, any other unique biometric identification collected,
charges, appropriate charge codes, and descriptions of all persons who are arrested for such
offenses on standard fingerprint forms supplied or approved by the highway patrol or
electronically in a format and manner approved by the highway patrol and in compliance with
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2498 2
the standards set by the Federal Bureau of Investigation in its Automated Fingerprint
Identification System or its successor program. All such agencies shall also notify the central
repository of all decisions not to refer such arrests for prosecution. An agency making such
arrests may enter into arrangements with other law enforcement agencies for the purpose of
furnishing without undue delay such fingerprints, photograph, and if available, any other
unique biometric identification collected, charges, appropriate charge codes, and descriptions
to the central repository upon its behalf.
3. In order for the Missouri office of prosecution services to maintain complete and
accurate statewide reports as required by section 56.750, on or before January 1, 2028, and
thereafter, all police officers of this state, the sheriff and each deputy sheriff of each county,
and the chief law enforcement official of a city not within a county and his or her officers
shall submit referrals for any traffic violation, ordinance violation, or misdemeanor or felony
offense referred to a prosecuting or circuit attorney in the form and manner approved by the
Missouri office of prosecution services as required by subdivision (7) of subsection 1 of
section 56.750. At a minimum, any referral to a prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney for a
felony offense shall include a probable cause statement and an investigative report. Any law
enforcement agency that violates this subsection shall be ineligible to receive state or federal
funds that would otherwise be paid to such agency for law enforcement, safety, or criminal
justice purposes.
4. In instances where an individual [less than seventeen] under eighteen years of age
and not currently certified as an adult is taken into custody for an offense [which] that would
be a class A or B felony, felony under chapter 566, or two felony offenses committed
within one hundred eighty days of each other, if committed by an adult, the arresting
officer shall take fingerprints for the central repository. These fingerprints shall be taken on
fingerprint cards supplied by or approved by the highway patrol or transmitted electronically
in a format and manner approved by the highway patrol and in compliance with the standards
set by the Federal Bureau of Investigation in its Automated Fingerprint Identification System
or its successor program. [The fingerprint cards shall be so constructed that the name of the
juvenile should not be made available to the central repository.] The individual's name and
the unique number associated with the fingerprints and other pertinent information shall be
provided to the court of jurisdiction by the agency taking the juvenile into custody. The
juvenile's fingerprints and other information shall be forwarded to the central repository and
the courts without undue delay. The fingerprint information from the card shall be captured
and stored in the automated fingerprint identification system operated by the central
repository. In the event the fingerprints are found to match other tenprints or unsolved latent
prints, the central repository shall notify the submitting agency who shall notify the court of
jurisdiction as per local agreement. [Under section 211.031, in instances where a juvenile

HB 2498 3
over fifteen and one-half years of age is alleged to have violated a state or municipal traffic
ordinance or regulation, which does not constitute a felony, and the juvenile court does not
have jurisdiction, the juvenile shall not be fingerprinted unless certified as an adult.]
5. Upon certification of the individual as an adult, the certifying court shall order a
law enforcement agency to immediately fingerprint and photograph the individual and
certification papers will be forwarded to the appropriate law enforcement agency with the
order for fingerprinting. The law enforcement agency shall submit such fingerprints,
photograph, and certification papers to the central repository within fifteen days and shall
furnish the offense cycle number associated with the fingerprints to the prosecuting attorney
or the circuit attorney of a city not within a county and to the clerk of the court ordering the
subject fingerprinted. If the juvenile is acquitted of the crime and is no longer certified as an
adult, the prosecuting attorney shall notify within fifteen days the central repository of the
change of status of the juvenile. Records of a child who has been fingerprinted and
photographed after being taken into custody shall be closed records as provided under section
610.100 if a petition has not been filed within thirty days of the date that the child was taken
into custody; and if a petition for the child has not been filed within one year of the date the
child was taken into custody, any records relating to the child concerning the alleged offense
may be expunged under the procedures in sections 610.122 to 610.126.
6. The prosecuting attorney of each county or the circuit attorney of a city not within
a county or the municipal prosecuting attorney shall notify the central repository on standard
forms supplied by the highway patrol or in a manner approved by the highway patrol of his or
her decision to not file a criminal charge on any charge referred to such prosecuting attorney
or circuit attorney for criminal charges. All records forwarded to the central repository and
the courts by prosecutors or circuit attorneys as required by sections 43.500 to 43.530 shall
include the state offense cycle number of the offense, the charge code for the offense, and the
originating agency identifier number of the reporting prosecutor, using such numbers as
assigned by the highway patrol.
7. The clerk of the courts of each county or city not within a county or municipal
court clerk shall furnish the central repository, on standard forms supplied by the highway
patrol or in a manner approved by the highway patrol, with a record of all charges filed,
including all those added subsequent to the filing of a criminal court case, amended charges,
and all final dispositions of cases for which the central repository has a record of an arrest or a
record of fingerprints reported pursuant to sections 43.500 to 43.506. Such information shall
include, for each charge:
(1) All judgments of not guilty, acquittals on the ground of mental disease or defect
excluding responsibility, judgments or pleas of guilty including the sentence, if any, or

HB 2498 4
probation, if any, pronounced by the court, nolle pros, discharges, releases and dismissals in
the trial court;
(2) Court orders filed with the clerk of the courts which reverse a reported conviction
or vacate or modify a sentence;
(3) Judgments terminating or revoking a sentence to probation, supervision or
conditional release and any resentencing after such revocation; and
(4) The offense cycle number of the offense, and the originating agency identifier
number of the sentencing court, using such numbers as assigned by the highway patrol.
8. The clerk of the courts of each county or city not within a county shall furnish, to
the department of corrections or department of mental health, court judgment and sentence
documents and the state offense cycle number and the charge code of the offense which
resulted in the commitment or assignment of an offender to the jurisdiction of the department
of corrections or the department of mental health if the person is committed pursuant to
100 chapter 552. This information shall be reported to the department of corrections or the
101 department of mental health at the time of commitment or assignment. If the offender was
102 already in the custody of the department of corrections or the department of mental health at
103 the time of such subsequent conviction, the clerk shall furnish notice of such subsequent
104 conviction to the appropriate department by certified mail, return receipt requested, or in a
105 manner and format mutually agreed to, within fifteen days of such disposition.
106 9. Information and fingerprints, photograph and if available, any other unique
107 biometric identification collected, forwarded to the central repository, normally obtained from
108 a person at the time of the arrest, may be obtained at any time the subject is in the criminal
109 justice system or committed to the department of mental health. A law enforcement agency
110 or the department of corrections may fingerprint, photograph, and capture any other unique
111 biometric identification of the person unless collecting other unique biometric identification
112 of the person is not financially feasible for the law enforcement agency, and obtain the
113 necessary information at any time the subject is in custody. If at the time of any court
114 appearance, the defendant has not been fingerprinted and photographed for an offense in
115 which a fingerprint and photograph is required by statute to be collected, maintained, or
116 disseminated by the central repository, the court shall order a law enforcement agency or
117 court marshal to fingerprint and photograph immediately the defendant. The order for
118 fingerprints shall contain the offense, charge code, date of offense, and any other information
119 necessary to complete the fingerprint card. The law enforcement agency or court marshal
120 shall submit such fingerprints, photograph, and if available, any other unique biometric
121 identification collected, to the central repository without undue delay and within thirty days
122 and shall furnish the offense cycle number associated with the fingerprints to the prosecuting

HB 2498 5
123 attorney or the circuit attorney of a city not within a county and to the court clerk of the court
124 ordering the subject fingerprinted.
125 10. The department of corrections and the department of mental health shall furnish
126 the central repository with all information concerning the receipt, escape, execution, death,
127 release, pardon, parole, commutation of sentence, granting of executive clemency, legal name
128 change, or discharge of an individual who has been sentenced to that department's custody for
129 any offenses which are mandated by law to be collected, maintained or disseminated by the
130 central repository. All records forwarded to the central repository by the department as
131 required by sections 43.500 to 43.651 shall include the offense cycle number of the offense,
132 and the originating agency identifier number of the department using such numbers as
133 assigned by the highway patrol.
211.071. 1. (1) If a petition or motion to modify alleges that a child between the ages
of fourteen and eighteen has committed an offense that would be considered a class A or B
felony, felony under chapter 566, or two felony offenses committed within one hundred
eighty days of each other, if committed by an adult, the court may, upon its own motion or
upon motion by the juvenile officer, the office of the prosecuting attorney, the office of the
attorney general if the attorney general is acting as a special prosecuting attorney, the
child, or the child's custodian, order a hearing, at which the prosecuting attorney or
attorney general may present evidence if the prosecuting attorney or attorney general
filed the petition, and may, in its discretion, dismiss the petition or motion to modify and
such child may be transferred to the court of general jurisdiction and prosecuted under the
general law; except that, if a petition alleges that a child between the ages of twelve and
eighteen has committed an offense that would be considered first degree murder under section
565.020, second degree murder under section 565.021, first degree assault under section
565.050, forcible rape under section 566.030 as it existed prior to August 28, 2013, rape in the
first degree under section 566.030, forcible sodomy under section 566.060 as it existed prior
to August 28, 2013, sodomy in the first degree under section 566.060, first degree robbery
under section 569.020 as it existed prior to January 1, 2017, robbery in the first degree under
section 570.023, distribution of drugs under section 195.211 as it existed prior to January 1,
2017, or the manufacturing of a controlled substance under section 579.055, if committed by
an adult, or a dangerous felony as defined in section 556.061, or any felony involving the use,
assistance, or aid of a deadly weapon, or has committed two or more prior unrelated offenses
that would be felonies if committed by an adult, the court shall order a hearing, and may, in its
discretion, dismiss the petition or motion to modify and transfer the child to a court of general
jurisdiction for prosecution under the general law.
(2) The moving party shall be solely responsible for all duties enumerated under
this section. If the juvenile officer forwards to the prosecutor a class A or B felony that

HB 2498 6
is not certified by the juvenile officer, the prosecutor shall notify the juvenile officer
within thirty days of the decision to certify the case.
2. Upon apprehension and arrest, jurisdiction over the criminal offense allegedly
committed by any person between eighteen and twenty-one years of age over whom the
juvenile court has retained continuing jurisdiction shall automatically terminate and that
offense shall be dealt with in the court of general jurisdiction as provided in section 211.041.
3. Knowing and willful age misrepresentation by a juvenile subject shall not affect
any action or proceeding which occurs based upon the misrepresentation. Any evidence
obtained during the period of time in which a child misrepresents his or her age may be used
against the child and will be subject only to rules of evidence applicable in adult proceedings.
4. Written notification of a transfer hearing shall be given to the juvenile and his or
her custodian in the same manner as provided in sections 211.101 and 211.111. Notice of the
hearing may be waived by the custodian. Notice shall contain a statement that the purpose of
the hearing is to determine whether the child is a proper subject to be dealt with under the
provisions of this chapter, and that if the court finds that the child is not a proper subject to be
dealt with under the provisions of this chapter, the petition or motion to modify will be
dismissed to allow for prosecution of the child under the general law.
5. The juvenile officer [may] shall consult with the office of prosecuting attorney
concerning any offense for which the child could be certified as an adult under this section.
The prosecuting or circuit attorney shall have access to police reports, reports of the juvenile
or deputy juvenile officer, statements of witnesses, a copy of the completed Missouri
juvenile detention assessment (JDTA) form that was used in determining detention, and
all other records or reports relating to the offense alleged to have been committed by the
child. The prosecuting or circuit attorney shall have access to the disposition records of the
child when the child has been adjudicated pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of
section 211.031. The prosecuting attorney shall not divulge any information regarding the
child and the offense until the juvenile court at a judicial hearing has determined that the child
is not a proper subject to be dealt with under the provisions of this chapter. Any use of the
JDTA or any other assessment system to determine if a juvenile may be held shall be
used as a guideline but shall not be mandatory.
6. In every incident, the juvenile officer shall consider legally sufficient charges
submitted by law enforcement when utilizing the JDTA form when determining whether
to detain a juvenile and shall provide a copy of the completed JDTA form back to the
law enforcement agency once a determination has been made.
7. Notwithstanding any provision of law or Missouri supreme court operating
rule, law enforcement agencies that detain juveniles for offenses that would be a class A
or B felony, felony under chapter 566, or two felony offenses committed within one

HB 2498 7
hundred eighty days of each other, if committed by an adult, shall collect fingerprints
and forward detention information to the central repository in a manner prescribed by
the central repository. The juvenile officer and court of jurisdiction over the juvenile
offender shall report all adjudication, delinquency, and custody information to the
central repository in a manner prescribed by the central repository. All information
reported under this subsection shall be available to criminal justice agencies for the
administration of criminal justice under section 43.500 through the Missouri uniform
law enforcement system (MULES).
8. A written report shall be prepared in accordance with this chapter developing fully
all available information relevant to the criteria which shall be considered by the court in
determining whether the child is a proper subject to be dealt with under the provisions of this
chapter and whether there are reasonable prospects of rehabilitation within the juvenile justice
system. These criteria shall include but not be limited to:
(1) The seriousness of the offense alleged and whether the protection of the
community requires transfer to the court of general jurisdiction;
(2) Whether the offense alleged involved viciousness, force and violence;
(3) Whether the offense alleged was against persons or property with greater weight
being given to the offense against persons, especially if personal injury resulted;
(4) Whether the offense alleged is a part of a repetitive pattern of offenses which
indicates that the child may be beyond rehabilitation under the juvenile code;
(5) The record and history of the child, including experience with the juvenile justice
system, other courts, supervision, commitments to juvenile institutions and other placements;
(6) The sophistication and maturity of the child as determined by consideration of his
or her home and environmental situation, emotional condition and pattern of living;
(7) The age of the child;
(8) The program and facilities available to the juvenile court in considering
disposition;
(9) Whether or not the child can benefit from the treatment or rehabilitative programs
available to the juvenile court; and
(10) Racial disparity in certification.
[7.] 9. If the court dismisses the petition to permit the child to be prosecuted under the
general law, the court shall enter a dismissal order containing:
(1) Findings showing that the court had jurisdiction of the cause and of the parties;
(2) Findings showing that the child was represented by counsel;
(3) Findings showing that the hearing was held in the presence of the child and his or
her counsel; and

HB 2498 8
100 (4) Findings showing the reasons underlying the court's decision to transfer
101 jurisdiction.
102 [8.] 10. A copy of the petition or motion to modify and order of the dismissal shall be
103 sent to the prosecuting attorney.
104 [9.] 11. When a petition or motion to modify has been dismissed thereby permitting a
105 child to be prosecuted under the general law and the prosecution of the child results in a
106 conviction, the jurisdiction of the juvenile court over that child is forever terminated, except
107 as provided in subsection 10 of this section, for an act that would be a violation of a state law
108 or municipal ordinance.
109 [10.] 12. If a petition or motion to modify has been dismissed thereby permitting a
110 child to be prosecuted under the general law and the child is found not guilty by a court of
111 general jurisdiction, the juvenile court shall have jurisdiction over any later offense
112 committed by that child which would be considered a misdemeanor or felony if committed by
113 an adult, subject to the certification provisions of this section.
114 [11.] 13. If the court does not dismiss the petition or motion to modify to permit the
115 child to be prosecuted under the general law, it shall set a date for the hearing upon the
116 petition as provided in section 211.171.
117 14. For purposes of this section, the term "legally sufficient" means a reasonable
118 belief with articulable facts that a crime has been or is being committed based on the
119 totality of the circumstances.
211.151. 1. Pending disposition of a case, the juvenile court may order in writing the
detention of a child in one of the following places:
(1) A juvenile detention facility provided by the county;
(2) A shelter care facility, subject to the supervision of the court;
(3) A suitable place of detention maintained by an association having for one of its
objects the care and protection of children;
(4) Such other suitable custody as the court may direct.
2. A child shall not be detained in a jail or other adult detention facility pending
disposition of a case.
3. Law enforcement officers shall take fingerprints and photographs of a child taken
into custody for offenses that would be [considered felonies] reportable under section
43.506 if committed by adults[, without the approval of the juvenile judge]. A child taken
into custody as a victim of abuse or neglect or as a status offender pursuant to subdivision (1)
or (2) of subsection 1 of section 211.031 [or for an offense that would be considered a
misdemeanor if committed by an adult] may be fingerprinted or photographed with the
consent of the juvenile judge. Records of a child who has been fingerprinted and
photographed after being taken into custody shall be closed records as provided under section

HB 2498 9
610.100 if a petition has not been filed within thirty days of the date that the child was taken
into custody; and if a petition for the child has not been filed within one year of the date the
child was taken into custody, any records relating to the child concerning the alleged offense
may be expunged under the procedures in sections 610.122 to 610.126.
4. (1) As used in this section, the term "jail or other adult detention facility" means
any locked facility administered by state, county or local law enforcement and correctional
agencies, a primary purpose of which is to detain adults charged with violating a criminal law
pending trial, including facilities of a temporary nature which do not hold persons after they
have been formally charged, or to confine adults convicted of an offense. The term "jail or
other adult detention facility" does not include a juvenile detention facility.
(2) As used in this section, the term "juvenile detention facility" means a place,
institution, building or part thereof, set of buildings or area, whether or not enclosing a
building or set of buildings, which has been designated by the juvenile court as a place of
detention for juveniles and which is operated, administered and staffed separately and
independently of a jail or other detention facility for adults and used exclusively for the lawful
custody and treatment of juveniles. The facility may be owned or operated by public or
private agencies. A juvenile detention facility may be located in the same building or grounds
as a jail or other adult detention facility if there is spatial separation between the facilities
which prevents haphazard or accidental contact between juvenile and adult detainees; there is
separation between juvenile and adult program activities; and there are separate juvenile and
adult staff other than specialized support staff who have infrequent contact with detainees.
211.261. 1. An appeal shall be allowed to the child from any final judgment, order or
decree made under the provisions of this chapter and may be taken on the part of the child by
its parent, guardian, legal custodian, spouse, relative or next friend. An appeal shall be
allowed to a parent from any final judgment, order or decree made under the provisions of
this chapter which adversely affects him. An appeal shall be allowed to the juvenile officer,
prosecuting attorney, or attorney general from any final judgment, order or decree made
under this chapter, except that no such appeal shall be allowed concerning a final
determination pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section 211.031. Notice of
appeal shall be filed within thirty days after the final judgment, order or decree has been
entered but neither the notice of appeal nor any motion filed subsequent to the final judgment
acts as a supersedeas unless the court so orders.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of this section, an appeal shall be
allowed to the:
(1) Juvenile officer from any order suppressing evidence, a confession or an
admission, in proceedings under subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section 211.031;

HB 2498 10
(2) Juvenile officer, prosecuting attorney, or attorney general under section
211.071; or
[(2)] (3) Parent, guardian ad litem, child's counsel, or juvenile officer from any order
changing or modifying the placement of a child.
3. The appeal provided for in subsection 2 of this section shall be an interlocutory
appeal, filed in the appropriate district of the Missouri court of appeals. Notice of such
interlocutory appeal shall be filed within three days of the entry of the order of trial court; the
time limits applicable to such appeal shall be the same as in interlocutory appeals allowed to
the state in criminal cases.
✔